Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-226
Board; officers; adopt rules of procedure.

Each such board shall organize, select officers for terms to be fixed by the agreement, and adopt and from time to time amend rules of procedure.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(6), p. 166.